Final source/morphy/foma/Noun-Neut_consonant.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols   N+ RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +NOM +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL
LEXICON Root

NounNeutConsonantStem;

LEXICON NounNeutConsonant


්+N+RT:් #;
්+N+RT+PL+NOM:් #;
්+N+RT+PL+ACC:් #;
්+N+RT+PL+VOC:් #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM: #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC: #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+VOC: #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+CJ:ත් #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+CJ:ත් #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+FN:යි #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+FN:යි #;
්+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM:ක් #;
්+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC:ක් #;
්+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM+CJ:කුත් #;
්+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+CJ:කුත් #;
්+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM+FN:කි #;
්+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+FN:කි #;
්+N+RT+PL+NOM+CJ:ුත් #;
්+N+RT+PL+ACC+CJ:ුත් #;
්+N+RT+PL+NOM+FN: ුයි #;
්+N+RT+PL+ACC+FN: ුයි #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+INT:ෙන් #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL:ෙන් #; 
්+N+RT+SG+DF+INT+CJ:ෙනුත් #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+CJ:ෙනුත් #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+INT+FN:ෙනි #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+FN:ෙනි #;
්+N+RT+SG+ID+INT:කින් #;
්+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL:කින් #;
්+N+RT+SG+ID+INT+CJ:කිනුත් #;
්+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+CJ:කිනුත් #;
්+N+RT+SG+ID+INT+FN:කිනි #;
්+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+FN:කිනි #;
්+N+RT+PL+INT:්වලින් #;
්+N+RT+PL+ABL:්වලින් #;
්+N+RT+PL+INT+CJ:්වලිනුත් #;
්+N+RT+PL+ABL+CJ:්වලිනුත් #;
්+N+RT+PL+INT+FN:්වලිනි #;
්+N+RT+PL+ABL+FN:්වලිනි #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT:ට #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+CJ:ටත් #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+FN:ටයි #;
්+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT:කට #;
්+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+CJ:කටත් #;
්+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+FN:කටයි #;
්+N+RT+PL+DAT:්වලට #;
්+N+RT+PL+DAT+CJ:්වලටත් #;
්+N+RT+PL+DAT+FN:්වලටයි #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:ේ #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:ේත් #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:ේයි #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:ෙ #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:ෙත් #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:ෙයි #;
්+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN:ක #;
්+N+RT+SG+ID+LOC:ක #;
්+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+CJ:කයි #;
්+N+RT+SG+ID+LOC+CJ:කයි #;
්+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+FN:කයි #;
්+N+RT+SG+ID+LOC+FN:කයි #;
්+N+RT+PL+GEN:්වල #;
්+N+RT+PL+LOC:්වල #;
්+N+RT+PL+GEN+CJ:්වලත් #;
්+N+RT+PL+LOC+CJ:්වලත් #;
්+N+RT+PL+GEN+FN:්වලයි #;
්+N+RT+PL+LOC+FN:්වලයි #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+LOC:ෙහි #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+LOC+CJ: ෙහිත් #;
්+N+RT+SG+DF+LOC+FN:ෙහියි #;

LEXICON NounNeutConsonantStem
අගැයීම	NounNeutConsonant;
අඩගැසීම	NounNeutConsonant;
අඬගැහීම	NounNeutConsonant;
අත්තිවාරම	NounNeutConsonant;
අත්වැල	NounNeutConsonant;
අතෑරුම	NounNeutConsonant;
අදිටන	NounNeutConsonant;
අනුපිටපත	NounNeutConsonant;
අපිරිසිදුකම	NounNeutConsonant;
අභිමන	NounNeutConsonant;
අයිස්ක්‍රීම	NounNeutConsonant;
අල්ලස	NounNeutConsonant;
අවමගුල	NounNeutConsonant;
අස්වැද්දීම	NounNeutConsonant;
අසාධරණකම	NounNeutConsonant;
අහිත	NounNeutConsonant;
ආරවුල	NounNeutConsonant;
ඇගයුම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඇඟුම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඇඬීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඇදවැටීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඇදිනීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඇනීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඇඳුනුම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඇමදීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඇඹුම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඇරලුම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඇලළුම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඇවෑම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඇවිස්සුම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඇසිරුම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඇහිරීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඈනුම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඉක්මීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඉගැන්වුම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඉඩකඩම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඉදිකිරීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඉන්දීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඉපයීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඉරීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඉල්ලුම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඉවසීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඉසිලීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඉහිලීම	NounNeutConsonant;
උකුල	NounNeutConsonant;
උදුන	NounNeutConsonant;
උල	NounNeutConsonant;
එතීම	NounNeutConsonant;
එරීම	NounNeutConsonant;
එලීම	NounNeutConsonant;
එළඹුම	NounNeutConsonant;
එළීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඔප්නැංවුම	NounNeutConsonant;
කටගැස්ම	NounNeutConsonant;
කඩිනම	NounNeutConsonant;
කතිකාවත	NounNeutConsonant;
කම්මුල	NounNeutConsonant;
කලස	NounNeutConsonant;
කළඳ	NounNeutConsonant;
කැකෑරීම	NounNeutConsonant;
කැඩීම	NounNeutConsonant;
කැප්පීම	NounNeutConsonant;
කැඹුරීම	NounNeutConsonant;
කැලැත්තීම	NounNeutConsonant;
කැහුම	NounNeutConsonant;
කිපීම	NounNeutConsonant;
කියවීම	NounNeutConsonant;
කිරුම	NounNeutConsonant;
කුදලුම	NounNeutConsonant;
කෙටීම	NounNeutConsonant;
කෙඳිරීම	NounNeutConsonant;
කෙලසීම	NounNeutConsonant;
කෙළීම	NounNeutConsonant;
කොතැන	NounNeutConsonant;
කොවිල	NounNeutConsonant;
ගණන	NounNeutConsonant;
ගරාවැටුම	NounNeutConsonant;
ගසාලීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ගැණුම	NounNeutConsonant;
ගැරහුම	NounNeutConsonant;
ගැල්වුම	NounNeutConsonant;
ගැසීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ගෑම	NounNeutConsonant;
ගිරිකුල	NounNeutConsonant;
ගිවිසුම	NounNeutConsonant;
ගෙනීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ගෙරවුම	NounNeutConsonant;
ගොඩනැගීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ගොවිතැන	NounNeutConsonant;
ණයවරපත	NounNeutConsonant;
තප්පුලුම	NounNeutConsonant;
තානායම	NounNeutConsonant;
තැතීම	NounNeutConsonant;
තැබෑරුම	NounNeutConsonant;
තැවුම	NounNeutConsonant;
තිබුම	NounNeutConsonant;
තෙතිත	NounNeutConsonant;
තෙමුම	NounNeutConsonant;
තොවිල	NounNeutConsonant;
දත	NounNeutConsonant;
දවාල	NounNeutConsonant;
දැක්කුම	NounNeutConsonant;
දැඩිකම	NounNeutConsonant;
දැපීම	NounNeutConsonant;
දැල්වුම	NounNeutConsonant;
දිග්ගැස්සීම	NounNeutConsonant;
දියත	NounNeutConsonant;
දිරුම	NounNeutConsonant;
දිව්රීම	NounNeutConsonant;
දිවුරීම	NounNeutConsonant;
දුප්පත්කම	NounNeutConsonant;
දුසිරිත	NounNeutConsonant;
දෙතන	NounNeutConsonant;
දෙබස	NounNeutConsonant;
දෙසවන	NounNeutConsonant;
දොළදුක	NounNeutConsonant;
නාඩගම	NounNeutConsonant;
නැකත	NounNeutConsonant;
නැටවුම	NounNeutConsonant;
නැවීම	NounNeutConsonant;
නෑවුම	NounNeutConsonant;
නිපැයුම	NounNeutConsonant;
නිරුවත	NounNeutConsonant;
නෙරපුම	NounNeutConsonant;
පත	NounNeutConsonant;
පරිස්සම	NounNeutConsonant;
පසිඳලුම	NounNeutConsonant;
පාඩම	NounNeutConsonant;
පැටවුම	NounNeutConsonant;
පැනනැගීම	NounNeutConsonant;
පැල්පත	NounNeutConsonant;
පැසීම	NounNeutConsonant;
පෑයුම	NounNeutConsonant;
පිදීම	NounNeutConsonant;
පිම්බුම	NounNeutConsonant;
පිරිද්දීම	NounNeutConsonant;
පිරිස	NounNeutConsonant;
පිසුම	NounNeutConsonant;
පිළිවදන	NounNeutConsonant;
පුදසුන	NounNeutConsonant;
පෙත්සම	NounNeutConsonant;
පෙරළීම	NounNeutConsonant;
පොත	NounNeutConsonant;
බයිපාස	NounNeutConsonant;
බ්ලොග	NounNeutConsonant;
බැමුම	NounNeutConsonant;
බිණීම	NounNeutConsonant;
බිල්පත	NounNeutConsonant;
බේරීම	NounNeutConsonant;
මඟුල	NounNeutConsonant;
මහණකම	NounNeutConsonant;
මැඩලීම	NounNeutConsonant;
මැරීම	NounNeutConsonant;
මිණුම	NounNeutConsonant;
මිශ්‍රකෙරීම	NounNeutConsonant;
මුඳුන	NounNeutConsonant;
මෙතැන	NounNeutConsonant;
යන්තම	NounNeutConsonant;
යැවීම	NounNeutConsonant;
රඟහල	NounNeutConsonant;
රාත්තල	NounNeutConsonant;
රැහැන	NounNeutConsonant;
රීටුම	NounNeutConsonant;
ලැප්ටොප	NounNeutConsonant;
ලිස්සුම	NounNeutConsonant;
වක්කලම	NounNeutConsonant;
වන්නම	NounNeutConsonant;
වශීකෙරුම	NounNeutConsonant;
වැගිරුම	NounNeutConsonant;
වැඩවැරුම	NounNeutConsonant;
වැදෑරීම	NounNeutConsonant;
වැරදීම	NounNeutConsonant;
වැසීම	NounNeutConsonant;
වැළැක්වීම	NounNeutConsonant;
විදහීම	NounNeutConsonant;
විමන	NounNeutConsonant;
විල	NounNeutConsonant;
වෙදකම	NounNeutConsonant;
වෙළඳාම	NounNeutConsonant;
සංසිඳුම	NounNeutConsonant;
සප්පායම	NounNeutConsonant;
සමවැදුම	NounNeutConsonant;
සවල	NounNeutConsonant;
සැත්කම	NounNeutConsonant;
සැරසුම	NounNeutConsonant;
සැලැස්සීම	NounNeutConsonant;
සිත	NounNeutConsonant;
සියත	NounNeutConsonant;
සීලිම	NounNeutConsonant;
සුළඟ	NounNeutConsonant;
සේසත	NounNeutConsonant;
හරිගැස්සුම	NounNeutConsonant;
හැඟවුම	NounNeutConsonant;
හැදිනුම	NounNeutConsonant;
හැරදැමුම	NounNeutConsonant;
හෑරුම	NounNeutConsonant;
හිතුම	NounNeutConsonant;
හිස්කම	NounNeutConsonant;
හෙල	NounNeutConsonant;
හේන	NounNeutConsonant;
පැවතුම	NounNeutConsonant;
අගම	NounNeutConsonant;
සාමාගම	NounNeutConsonant;
ආරාවුල	NounNeutConsonant;
චෙක්පත	NounNeutConsonant;
කැනීම	NounNeutConsonant;
රඟදැක්වීම	NounNeutConsonant;
අනුකොටස	NounNeutConsonant;
කිවිසුම	NounNeutConsonant;
තේරැම	NounNeutConsonant;
පෑස්සීම	NounNeutConsonant;
මෙවන	NounNeutConsonant;
විගඩම	NounNeutConsonant;
සියපත	NounNeutConsonant;
ගොවිබිම	NounNeutConsonant;
අල්ලස	NounNeutConsonant;
ගඩොල	NounNeutConsonant;
කංඩායම	NounNeutConsonant;
රටාවල	NounNeutConsonant;
පැල්පත	NounNeutConsonant;
දැල	NounNeutConsonant;
අවදනම	NounNeutConsonant;
දෙපතුල	NounNeutConsonant;
මහරත්මල	NounNeutConsonant;
විසර	NounNeutConsonant;
කාඩ්පත	NounNeutConsonant;
එළඹුම	NounNeutConsonant;
නෙළීම	NounNeutConsonant;
එට	NounNeutConsonant;
නැංගුරම	NounNeutConsonant;
ශරීරවිදීම	NounNeutConsonant;
උඳුන	NounNeutConsonant;
හුවමාරුවීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ගෙමිදුල	NounNeutConsonant;
උගුල	NounNeutConsonant;
සඳහන	NounNeutConsonant;
බිල්පත	NounNeutConsonant;
ඝනකම	NounNeutConsonant;
අතපෙවීම	NounNeutConsonant;
බහාලීම	NounNeutConsonant;
කමටහන	NounNeutConsonant;
පණ්ඩිතකම	NounNeutConsonant;
සාර්ථකවීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඇතුන	NounNeutConsonant;
කඩිත්තක	NounNeutConsonant;
දිගුකලක	NounNeutConsonant;
බලපැවැත්වීම	NounNeutConsonant;
මිතුරුදම	NounNeutConsonant;
වෙව්ලීම	NounNeutConsonant;
හුදෙකලාවීම	NounNeutConsonant;
එස	NounNeutConsonant;
හිරවීම	NounNeutConsonant;
කෙරීම	NounNeutConsonant;
අම්බලම	NounNeutConsonant;
එලීම	NounNeutConsonant;
පුන්කලස	NounNeutConsonant;
පනත	NounNeutConsonant;
එන්ජිම	NounNeutConsonant;
කණ්ඩලම	NounNeutConsonant;
මුදවාගැනීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ආගම	NounNeutConsonant;
නැකැත	NounNeutConsonant;
ඇදුම	NounNeutConsonant;
බැදුම	NounNeutConsonant;
ප්‍රේමජයන්ත	NounNeutConsonant;
ගැස්වීම	NounNeutConsonant;
මුල්ගල	NounNeutConsonant;
පාවාදීම	NounNeutConsonant;
පාළම	NounNeutConsonant;
කැලඹීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ගොවිකම	NounNeutConsonant;
යෙදීම	NounNeutConsonant;
නිජබිම	NounNeutConsonant;
පින්සල	NounNeutConsonant;
දවස	NounNeutConsonant;
හැඳින්වීම	NounNeutConsonant;
පිළිගැනිම	NounNeutConsonant;
හිඟවීම	NounNeutConsonant;
මයිල	NounNeutConsonant;
පිහිනීම	NounNeutConsonant;
කණ්ඩාම	NounNeutConsonant;
හදුන්වාදිම	NounNeutConsonant;
හැඬීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ගොඩනැංවීම	NounNeutConsonant;
පිරිහීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඇන්ජිම	NounNeutConsonant;
පිළිගැනීම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඉල්ලූම	NounNeutConsonant;
මියයෑම	NounNeutConsonant;
බින්දුව	NounNeutConsonant;
ගෙන්වීම	NounNeutConsonant;
දිවුරුම්දීම	NounNeutConsonant;
නිපදවීම	NounNeutConsonant;
බලගැන්වීම	NounNeutConsonant;
මැල්ලුම	NounNeutConsonant;
ඇරඹුම	NounNeutConsonant;
පිරිනැමීම	NounNeutConsonant;
නොගෙවීම	NounNeutConsonant;
හදුන්වාදීම	NounNeutConsonant;
කැඩීම	NounNeutConsonant;
හවස	NounNeutConsonant;
ඔහුගේ	NounNeutConsonant;
නායකයො	NounNeutConsonant;
වාගේම	NounNeutConsonant;
නිමකිරීම	NounNeutConsonant;
වැඩිවිම	NounNeutConsonant;
කොහේ	NounNeutConsonant;
එකේ	NounNeutConsonant;
හෙදකම	NounNeutConsonant;
